Illinois, session 104th, HB3920.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $17,238,400, or so much of that sum 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State 6Treasurer's Administrative Fund to the Office of the State 7Treasurer to meet its operational expenses for the fiscal year 8ending June 30, 2026. 9    Section 10. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much of that sum 10as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the State Treasurer for the purpose of making refunds 12of accrued interest on protested tax cases. 13    Section 15. The sum of $26,225,000, or so much of that sum 14as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Pensions 15Fund to the Office of the State Treasurer to meet its 16operational expenses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 17    Section 20. The sum of $10,035,270, or so much of that sum 18as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State 19Treasurer's Bank Services Trust Fund to the State Treasurer 20for the operational expenses authorized under the State 21Treasurer's Bank Services Trust Fund Act.   HB3920- 2 -LRB104 12320 JDS 22479 b1    Section 25. The following amounts, or so much of those 2amounts as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 3purposes named in this Section, are appropriated to the State 4Treasurer for the payment of interest on and retirement of 5State bonded indebtedness:6    For payment of principal and interest on any and all bonds 7issued pursuant to the Anti-Pollution Bond Act, the 8Transportation Bond Act, the Capital Development Bond Act of 91972, the School Construction Bond Act, the Illinois Coal and 10Energy Development Bond Act, and the General Obligation Bond 11Act: 12    From the General Obligation Bond Retirement and Interest 13Fund: 14Principal .....................................$2,370,028,488 15Interest.......................................$1,361,536,95216Total                                         $3,731,565,440  17    Section 30. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much of that sum 18as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 19Obligation Bond Rebate Fund to the State Treasurer for the 20purpose of making arbitrage rebate payments to the United 21States government. 22    Section 35. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much of that sum 23as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Charitable Trust   HB3920- 3 -LRB104 12320 JDS 22479 b1Stabilization Fund to the State Treasurer for the State 2Treasurer's operational costs to administer the Charitable 3Trust Stabilization Fund and for grants to public and private 4entities in the State for the purposes set out in the 5Charitable Trust Stabilization Act. 6    Section 40. The sum of $500,000, or so much of that sum as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Treasurer's 8Capital Fund for the construction, reconstruction, renovation, 9repair, operation and maintenance of the buildings, grounds 10and facilities of the State Treasurer. 11    Section 45. The sum of $2,500,000, or so much of that sum 12as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Higher 13Education Savings Program Fund to the Office of the State 14Treasurer for the Illinois Higher Education Savings Program. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 162025.